number_defns.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025 Information and Press Service of the Government of Luxembourg

# Modifications of original code made for the Luxembourgish langauge.

# Copyright (C) 2024 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

# Luxembourgish configuration file for Non-Routines' generalized tokenizer

# Note the PSep must be defined in the context in which the following definitions are then amde.
# As such, this file cannot stand alone since it does not define PSep

# In tok.foma within sentence tokenizer mode, this thousands separator will include reference to the core's 
# string boundaries.
# Whereas, in numbers.foma, it will just be the ascii code for a single space

define ampm  {Auer} word;
define spaceCode "#x20" | "#xA0" | "#xa0";
define CSep  spaceCode | [eb spaceCode sb];  # different thousand seps, for numbers.foma and tok.foma when operating in sentence-mode
define PSep  %. ;  # different thousand seps, for numbers.foma and tok.foma when operating in sentence-mode
define DecSep %,; # decimal separator
define OrdSuffix %.; # last one is the definite article. 

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;

define Currency [{$} | € ] (CSep);
define USDCCY [C:dollar | CC:dollar | [cc|Zcc]:cent |  [c|Zc]:cent ]; 
define EURCCY [C:euro | CC:euro | [cc|Zcc]:cent |  [c|Zc]:cent ]; 
define NameCurrencyComponents 
   [
       USDCCY -> ||  .#. {$} ?* _  ,,
       EURCCY -> ||  .#. € ?* _  
	 ] .o.  Currency:0 @-> || .#. _ ;

define FormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [PSep Digit^3]^{1,4} ;
define UnFormattedNumber %0 | [NZDigit Digit*] ;
define CardinalNumber FormattedNumber | UnFormattedNumber;
define OrdinalNumber CardinalNumber OrdSuffix;
define DecimalNumber [FormattedNumber | UnFormattedNumber] DecSep Digit+;
define ArabicNumber CardinalNumber | OrdinalNumber | DecimalNumber;
define currencyAmount  Currency [FormattedNumber | UnFormattedNumber] (DecSep Digit Digit); 
define ExpandedArabicNumber currencyAmount | CardinalNumber | DecimalNumber | OrdinalNumber;
